apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix
    <pardef n="Če/h__n"    >
    <e><p><l>h</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hu</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hu</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hu</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hom</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>si</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>sima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>he</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>si</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kri/k__n"    >
    <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>če</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kom</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kovi</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>kova</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>kovima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ke</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>kove</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kovi</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kovima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kovima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ptić__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lav__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rat__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="Čeh"><i>Če</i><par n="Če/h__n" /></e>
<e lm="krik"><i>kri</i><par n="kri/k__n" /></e>
<e lm="ptić"><i>ptić</i><par n="ptić__n" /></e>
<e lm="lav"><i>lav</i><par n="lav__n" /></e>
<e lm="rat"><i>rat</i><par n="rat__n" /></e>
